Hawaii statutes.
§458-3 Powers and duties. In addition
to any other powers and duties authorized by law, the director of commerce and
consumer affairs, subject to chapter 91, may adopt, amend, and repeal rules for
the administration of this chapter.

The director shall appoint an advisory
committee to serve as experts to the department in licensing matters. [L 1949,
c 183, pt of §1; RL 1955, §69-3; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §§6, 15; am L 1963, c
114, §3; am L 1965, c 96, §49; HRS §458-3; am L 1983, c 71, §1; am L 1985, c 255,
§6; am L 1987, c 300, §3; am L 1992, c 202, §116; am L 1997, c 301, §4]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next